Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB193.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 533.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person who has been convicted of an offense or who has entered a plea of
guilty to an offense is not sentenced to imprisonment, the court shall place him or
her on probation if he or she is in need of the supervision, guidance, assistance, or
direction that the probation service can provide. Conditions of probation shall be
imposed as provided in KRS 533.030, but the court may modify or enlarge the
conditions or, if the defendant commits an additional offense or violates a
condition, revoke the sentence at any time prior to the expiration or termination of
the period of probation. When setting conditions under this subsection, the court
shall not order any defendant to pay incarceration costs or any other cost permitted
to be ordered under KRS 533.010 or other statute, except restitution and any costs
owed to the Department of Corrections, through the circuit clerk.
(2) When a person who has been convicted of an offense or who has entered a plea of
guilty to an offense is not sentenced to imprisonment, the court may sentence him
or her to probation with an alternative sentence if it is of the opinion that the
defendant should conduct himself or herself according to conditions determined by
the court and that probationary supervision alone is insufficient. The court may
modify or enlarge the conditions or, if the defendant commits an additional offense
or violates a condition, revoke the sentence at any time prior to the expiration or
termination of the alternative sentence.
(3) When a person who has been convicted of an offense or who has entered a plea of
guilty to an offense is not sentenced to imprisonment, the court may sentence him
or her to conditional discharge if it is of the opinion that the defendant should
conduct himself or herself according to conditions determined by the court but that
probationary supervision is inappropriate. Conditions of conditional discharge shall
Page 1 of 3
BR017800.100 - 178 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 178
be imposed as provided in KRS 533.030, but the court may modify or enlarge the
conditions or, if the defendant commits an additional offense or violates a
condition, revoke the sentence at any time prior to the expiration or termination of
the period of conditional discharge.
(4) (a) The period of probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or conditional
discharge shall be fixed by the court and at any time may be extended or
shortened by a duly entered court order or as modified by the Department of
Corrections through the application of probation program credits under KRS
439.268.
(b) 1. Any[Such] period of supervision imposed under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, with extensions thereof, shall not exceed five (5) years, or
the time necessary to complete restitution, whichever is longer, upon
conviction of a felony, nor two (2) years, or the time necessary to
complete restitution, whichever is longer, upon conviction of a
misdemeanor.
2. If a violation of any condition imposed by the court during a period of
supervision imposed under paragraph (a) of this subsection is alleged
to have occurred within the last sixty (60) days of the period of
supervision, the court shall have sixty (60) days after the expiration of
the period of supervision imposed under paragraph (a) of this
subsection to determine if a violation occurred and the appropriate
action for the violation.
(c) 1. If a defendant who is subject to a period of supervision under
paragraph (a) of this subsection is alleged to have committed a
violation of the conditions imposed by the court, and a warrant has
been issued by the court based on an allegation of that violation, the
time between the issuance of the warrant and the defendant's first
Page 2 of 3
BR017800.100 - 178 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 178
appearance before the court after service of that warrant shall be
tolled and not count towards any period of supervision imposed under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, unless the court finds that the
defendant did not violate any condition imposed by the court.
2. The court shall have sixty (60) days after the defendant's first
appearance to schedule and complete any proceedings related to an
alleged violation described in subparagraph 1. of this section.
(d) Upon completion of the probationary period, probation with an alternative
sentence, or the period of conditional discharge, the defendant shall be
deemed finally discharged, provided no warrant issued by the court is pending
against him or her, and probation, probation with an alternative sentence, or
conditional discharge has not been revoked.
(5) Notwithstanding the fact that a sentence to probation, probation with an alternative
sentence, or conditional discharge can subsequently be modified or revoked, a
judgment that[which] includes such a sentence shall constitute a final judgment for
purposes of appeal.
Page 3 of 3
BR017800.100 - 178 - XXXX 3/3/2026 2:40 PM Jacketed